Washington statutes.
RCW 10.89.050

"Fresh pursuit" defined.

The term "fresh pursuit" as used in this chapter, shall include fresh pursuit as defined by the common law, and also the pursuit of a person who has committed a felony or who reasonably is suspected of having committed a felony or a violation of such other state relating to driving while intoxicated, driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, driving while impaired, or reckless driving. It shall also include the pursuit of a person suspected of having committed a supposed felony, or a supposed violation of the laws relating to driving while intoxicated, driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, driving while impaired, or reckless driving, though no felony or violation of the laws relating to driving while intoxicated, driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, driving while impaired, or reckless driving actually has been committed, if there is reasonable ground for believing that a felony or a violation of the laws relating to driving while intoxicated, driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, driving while impaired, or reckless driving has been committed. Fresh pursuit as used herein shall not necessarily imply instant pursuit, but pursuit without unreasonable delay.

[ 1998 c 205 s 2; 1943 c 261 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2252-5. Formerly RCW 10.88.090.]